New Jersey, session 221, A3607.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2005, c.310 (C.18A:6-113) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Within 180 days of the effective date of this act, the State Board of Education shall revise the Core Curriculum Content Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education to provide for instruction in suicide prevention , and mental health as it relates to suicide prevention, in an appropriate place in the curriculum of [elementary school, middle school, and high school pupils] students in each of the grades kindergarten through 12.  The instruction shall incorporate evidence-based standards and shall be adapted to the age and understanding of the students.  The instruction, at a minimum, shall include the following elements: a.     the concept of wellness including self-care and personal responsibility for ones own mental health and wellness; b.    the concept of mental health as an integral part of health; c.     recognition of the warning signs of suicide; d.    awareness of the risk of suicide and self-harm; e.     the relationship between mental health, substance abuse, and other negative coping behaviors; f.     the negative impact of stigma and cultural attitudes toward mental illness; g.    the implications of risk factors, protective factors, and resiliency on mental health and wellness; and h.    identifying appropriate professionals, services, and family supports for suicide prevention. (cf: P.L.2005, c.310, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment. STATEMENT Current law requires that instruction in suicide prevention be included in an appropriate place in the curriculum of elementary school, middle school, and high school students.  This bill provides that the instruction in suicide prevention will also include mental health as it relates to suicide prevention, and the instruction will be provided to students in each of the grades kindergarten through 12.  The instruction must incorporate evidence-based standards and be adapted to the age and understanding of the students.  The bill also specifies the following minimum elements that must be included as part of the instruction:  (a)  the concept of wellness including self-care and personal responsibility for ones own mental health and wellness; (b)  the concept of mental health as an integral part of health; (c)  recognition of the warning signs of suicide; (d) awareness of the risk of suicide and self-harm; (e) the relationship between mental health, substance abuse, and other negative coping behaviors; (f) the negative impact of stigma and cultural attitudes toward mental illness; (g) the implications of risk factors, protective factors, and resiliency on mental health and wellness; and (h) identifying appropriate professionals, services, and family supports for suicide prevention.